Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2

Pharmacy Practice

63-10-201. Short title.

Parts 2-5 of this chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996.”

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 19; T.C.A. § 63-10-401; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 2.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Occupation tax on pharmacists, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Physician assistants, §§ 63-19-106, 63-19-107.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Prevention of abuse of drugs by pharmacist, § 53-10-112.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

The Pharmacist's Duty to Warn When Dispensing Prescription Drugs: Recent Tennessee Developments, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 517 (1992).

United States v. Caronia: How True Does “Truthful” Have to Be?, 67 Vand. L. Rev. En Banc 157 (2014).

63-10-202. Practice of pharmacy.

The practice of pharmacy within the state is declared to be a professional practice affecting public health, safety and welfare and is subject to regulation and control in the public interest. It is further declared to be a matter of public interest and concern that the practice of pharmacy, as defined in § 63-10-204, merit and receive the confidence of the public and that only qualified persons be permitted to engage in the practice of pharmacy.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 2; T.C.A. § 63-10-402.

Cross-References.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-203. Statement of purpose.

The purpose of parts 2-5 of this chapter is to define and regulate the practice of pharmacy to protect the health, safety and welfare of the people of Tennessee.

The persons engaged in the practice of pharmacy shall be pharmacists, duly recognized by the state as necessary health care providers, and shall be entrusted through parts 4-6 of this chapter with a provision of care intended to enhance patients' wellness, prevent illness and optimize outcomes.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 3; T.C.A. § 63-10-403; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 2.

Cross-References.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-204. Definitions.

As used in parts 2-5 of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administer” means the direct application of a drug to a patient or research subject by injection, inhalation, ingestion, topical application or by any other means;

“Board” means the Tennessee board of pharmacy;

“Certification” means a voluntary process by which a practitioner's training, experience and knowledge are identified as meeting or surpassing a standard, defined or approved by the board beyond that required for licensure or registration;

“Collaborative pharmacy practice” is the practice of pharmacy whereby one (1) or more licensed pharmacists licensed in this state, jointly and voluntarily work with one (1) or more prescribers licensed in this state, under a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement to provide patient care services, to achieve optimal medication use and desired patient outcomes;

“Collaborative pharmacy practice agreement” is a written and signed agreement entered into voluntarily between one (1) or more licensed pharmacists in this state, and one (1) or more prescribers licensed in this state, each of whom is in active practice in this state providing patient care services in this state, that provides for collaborative pharmacy practice, as defined by law;

“Compounding” means the preparation, mixing, assembling, packaging or labeling of a drug or device:

As the result of a prescription order or initiative based on the prescriber-patient-pharmacist relationship in the course of professional practice;

In anticipation of prescription orders based on routine, regularly observed prescribing patterns;

For the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale or dispensing;

For use in a licensed prescribing practitioner's office for administration to the prescribing practitioner's patient or patients when the product is not commercially available upon receipt of an order from the prescriber;

For use in a health care facility for administration to a patient or patients receiving treatment or services provided by that facility when the product is not commercially available upon receipt of an order from an authorized licensed medical practitioner of the facility;

For use by emergency medical services for administration to a patient or patients receiving services from them under authorized medical control when the product is not commercially available upon receipt of an order from a licensed prescriber authorized to provide medical control; or

For use by a licensed veterinarian for administration to their nonhuman patient or patients or for dispensing to nonhuman patients in the course of the practice of veterinary medicine upon receipt of an order from a veterinarian when the product is not commercially available.

“Continuing education” means planned, organized learning experiences and activities beyond the basic educational or preparatory program. These learning experiences and activities are designed to promote the continuous development of skills, attitudes and knowledge necessary to maintain proficiency, provide quality service or products, be responsive to needs and keep abreast of significant change;

“Continuous quality improvement program” means a system of standards and procedures to identify and evaluate quality-related events and to improve patient care;

“Controlled substance” means a drug, substance or immediate precursor identified, defined or listed in title 39, chapter 17, part 4 and title 53, chapter 11;

“Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or attempted transfer from one person to another whether or not there is an agency relationship;

“Device” means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent or other similar or related article, including any component part or accessory, that is required under federal or state law to be ordered or prescribed by a person duly authorized;

“Dietary supplement” means a product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet that bears or contains one (1) or more of the following ingredients: a vitamin, mineral, herb or other botanical, amino acid, dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake, or a concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract or combination of any of these ingredients and any other products designated as dietary supplements by federal or state law;

“Director” means the director of the health related boards;

“Dispense” means preparing, packaging, compounding or labeling for delivery and actual delivery of a prescription drug, nonprescription drug or device in the course of professional practice to a patient or the patient's agent, to include a licensed health care practitioner or a health care facility providing services or treatment to the patient or patients, by or pursuant to the lawful order of a prescriber;

“Distribute” or “distribution” means the sale, purchase, trade, delivery, handling, storage, or receipt of a product or the arrangement of the sale, purchase, trade, delivery, handling, storage, or receipt of a product through third parties; provided, that “distribute” or “distribution” does not include dispensing or administering a product pursuant to a prescription, medical order, or an over-the-counter order. For the purposes of this part, transfers and sales of drugs or devices from one (1) licensed pharmacy to another shall not constitute distribution of drugs or devices;

“Distributor” means a person engaged in the distribution of drugs or devices; provided, that “distributor” does not include licensed wholesale distributors or licensed third-party logistics providers;

“Division” means the division of health related boards;

“Doctor of pharmacy” means a person duly licensed by the board to engage in the practice of pharmacy. “Doctor of pharmacy” and “pharmacist” shall be used interchangeably within parts 4-6 of this chapter and, any other provision of Tennessee Code Annotated and in any rule or regulation promulgated by the state and its agencies;

“Drug” means any of the following:

Articles recognized as drugs or drug products in any official compendium or supplement thereto;

Articles, other than food, intended to affect the structure or function of the body of humans or other animals;

Articles, including radioactive substances, intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in humans or other animals; or

Articles intended for use as a component of any articles specified in this subdivision (19);

“Executive director” means the executive director of the Tennessee board of pharmacy;

“Label” means any written, printed or graphic matter on the immediate container of a drug or device;

“Labeling” means the process of affixing all labels and other written, printed or graphic matter:

Upon any article or any of its containers or wrappers; or

Accompanying such article;

“Licensure” means the process by which an agency of government grants permission to an individual to engage in a given occupation upon finding that the applicant has attained the minimal degree of competency necessary to ensure that the public health, safety and welfare will be reasonably protected;

“Manufacturer” means any person, except a pharmacist compounding in the normal course of professional practice, engaged in the commercial production, preparation, propagation, conversion or processing of a drug, either directly or indirectly, by extraction from substances of natural origin or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or both, and includes any packaging or repackaging of a drug or the labeling or relabeling of its container and the promotion and marketing of such drugs or devices;

“Medical order” means a lawful order of a prescriber for a specific patient that may or may not include a prescription order, such orders subject to rules and regulations as may be promulgated from time to time by the respective boards that license the persons who are authorized to prescribe drugs;

“Medication therapy management program” means the distinct pharmacist-provided service or group of services that optimize therapeutic outcomes for individual patients. Medication therapy management services are independent of but can occur in conjunction with the provision of a medication product;

“Nonprescription device” means a device that may be sold or dispensed without a prescription order and that is labeled and packaged in compliance with applicable state or federal law;

“Nonprescription drug” means a drug that may be sold or dispensed without a prescription and that is labeled and packaged in compliance with applicable state or federal law;

“Outsourcing facility” means a facility engaged in the compounding of sterile drugs that has elected to register as an outsourcing facility with the U.S. food and drug administration and that complies with all relevant federal laws and regulations;

“Patient education” means the communication of information to the patient or caregiver by the pharmacist;

“Patient profile” means a written or electronic record of individual patient information, created in a pharmacy practice, for use by a pharmacist in the provision of pharmacy patient care services, including drug use review and patient counseling requirements. The profile may include, but is not limited to, demographic information, medical history, medication and devices utilized, testing results and pharmacist comments;

“Peer review committee” or “pharmacist review committee” means any committee, board, commission or other entity of any national, state or local professional association or society, including an impaired pharmacist peer review committee, a drug utilization review committee or a committee of any pharmacy benefits management organization, health care provider network, licensed health care institution or any health care organization, system or foundation, the function of which, or one of the functions of which, is to review, evaluate and improve the quality of pharmacy-related services provided by pharmacists or pharmacy auxiliary personnel, to provide intervention, support or rehabilitative referrals or services or to determine that pharmacy-related services rendered by pharmacists or pharmacy auxiliary personnel were professionally indicated or were performed in compliance with applicable quality standards, or that the cost of pharmacy-related services rendered by pharmacists or pharmacy auxiliary personnel was reasonable;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, corporation and the state, its departments, agencies and employees, and the political subdivisions of Tennessee and their departments, agencies and employees, except the department of health and local health departments;

“Pharmacist” means an individual health care provider licensed by the state, pursuant to parts 4-6 of this chapter, to practice the profession of pharmacy;

“Pharmacist-in-charge” means the supervisory pharmacist who has the authority and responsibility for compliance with laws and rules pertaining to the practice of pharmacy at the practice site of the pharmacist-in-charge;

“Pharmacy” means a location licensed by this state where drugs are compounded or dispensed under the supervision of a pharmacist, as defined in the rules of the board and where prescription orders are received or processed;

“Pharmacy intern” means an individual enrolled in or a graduate of a recognized school or college of pharmacy under rules established by the board who is serving a period of time of practical experience under the supervision of a pharmacist, as defined in the rules of the board;

“Pharmacy technician” means an individual who is specifically trained and designated to assist pharmacists in the practice of pharmacy;

“Practice of pharmacy” means a patient-oriented health service profession in which pharmacists interact and consult with patients and other health care professionals to enhance patients' wellness, prevent illness, and optimize outcomes. The practice involves:

Interpretation, evaluation and implementation of medical orders and prescription orders;

Responsibility for compounding and dispensing prescription orders, including radioactive substances;

Participation in drug, dietary supplement and device selection, storage, distribution and administration;

Drug evaluation, utilization or regimen review;

Maintenance of patient profiles and other pharmacy records;

Provision of patient education and counseling;

Provision of patient care services and activities pursuant to a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement;

Drug or drug-related research; and

Those professional acts, professional decisions or professional services necessary to maintain all areas of a patient's pharmacist-provided care;

Nothing in this chapter authorizes a pharmacist to order laboratory tests or prescribe any prescription drugs except pursuant to a medical order by the attending prescriber for each patient or pursuant to a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement jointly agreed upon by a pharmacist or pharmacists and a prescriber or prescribers; provided, that pharmacists are authorized to conduct and assist patients with tests approved for home use. Pharmacists may convey orders for laboratory tests when authorized by the attending prescriber and may prescribe prescription drugs when required to carry out a medical order or perform activities pursuant to a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement when authorized by the attending prescriber;

“Prescriber” means an individual authorized by law to prescribe drugs;

“Prescription drug” means a drug that under federal or state law is required to be dispensed only pursuant to a prescription order or is restricted to use by prescribers and that under federal law must be labeled with either the symbol “Rx only” or the statement “Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by, or on the order of, a licensed veterinarian”;

“Prescription order” means and includes any order, communicated through written, verbal, or electronic means by a physician, certified physician assistant, pharmacist in accordance with a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement pursuant to this section, dentist, veterinarian, optometrist authorized pursuant to § 63-8-102(12), or other allied medical practitioner, for any drug, device, or treatment;

“Prescription order” means and includes any order, communicated through written, verbal, or electronic means by a nurse authorized pursuant to § 63-6-204, who is prescribing in collaboration with and under the control and responsibility of a licensed physician, and who meets the requirements pursuant to § 63-7-207(14);

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the verbal communication to a pharmacist of a direct order for a prescription from a physician, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse or physician assistant pursuant to § 63-6-204, or dentist, veterinarian, optometrist authorized pursuant to § 63-8-102(12), or other allied medical practitioner by a pharmacist pursuant to § 63-9-113 nor shall this chapter prohibit verbal communication of a direct order for a prescription from one (1) pharmacist to another when ordered pursuant to a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement;

Nothing in this chapter shall require an advanced practice registered nurse specializing as a certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA) to obtain authorization to prescribe pursuant to § 63-7-123 in order to select, order, or administer appropriate drugs during services ordered by a physician, dentist, or podiatrist and provided by a CRNA in collaboration with the ordering physician, dentist, or podiatrist that are within the scope of practice of the CRNA and authorized by clinical privileges granted by the medical staff of the facility. Such an order by a CRNA for drugs shall only be valid for dispensing for administration at the facility where the anesthesia services are being provided;

“Provider” or “necessary health care provider” includes a pharmacist who provides health care services within the scope of pharmacy practice;

“Quality assurance program” means a system for identifying problems in patient care that are resolved via administrative, clinical or educational actions to ensure that final products and outcomes meet applicable specifications;

“Quality-related event” means the inappropriate dispensing or administration of a prescribed medication, including, but not limited to:

A variation from the prescriber's medical or prescription order, including, but not limited to:

Dispensing an incorrect drug;

Dispensing an incorrect drug strength;

Dispensing an incorrect dosage form;

Dispensing the drug to the wrong patient; and

Providing inadequate or incorrect packaging, labeling or directions for use; and

Failure to identify, prevent, resolve and manage potential and actual drug and drug-related problems, including, but not limited to:

Over-utilization and under-utilization;

Therapeutic duplication;

Drug-age contraindications;

Drug-allergy contraindications;

Drug-disease contraindications;

Drug-gender contraindications;

Drug-drug interactions;

Incorrect drug dosage;

Incorrect duration of drug therapy; and

Clinical abuse or misuse;

“Third-party logistics provider” means a person who provides or coordinates warehousing or other logistics services of a drug or device on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesale distributor, or dispenser of the drug or device, but does not take ownership of the drug or device, nor has responsibility to direct the sale or disposition of the drug or device;

“Unprofessional conduct” means the conduct of a pharmacist, pharmacy intern or pharmacy technician that is detrimental to patients or to the profession of pharmacy;

“Wholesale distribution” means the distribution of a drug or device to persons other than the patient or consumer, or the receipt of a drug or device by persons other than the patient or consumer; provided, that “wholesale distribution” does not include the distribution or receipt of products, transactions, or services that are exempted from this definition by rule. For the purposes of this part, transfers and sales of drugs or devices from one licensed pharmacy to another shall not constitute wholesale distribution of drugs or devices; and

“Wholesaler” or “wholesale distributor” means a person primarily engaged in the wholesale distribution of drugs or devices; provided, that “wholesaler” or “wholesale distributor” does not include licensed third-party logistics providers. For the purposes of this part, transfers and sales of drugs or devices from one licensed pharmacy to another shall not constitute wholesale distribution of drugs or devices.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 4; T.C.A. § 63-10-404; Acts 2006, ch. 768, § 1; 2007, ch. 407, §§ 2, 3; 2013, ch. 266, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 832, §§ 1-3; 2015, ch. 293, §§ 3, 4; 2015, ch. 513, § 1; 2016, ch. 980, § 19; 2017, ch. 334, § 6; 2018, ch. 617, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act relative to the relationship between physicians and advanced practice registered nurses, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 334.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in the definition of “prescription order”, deleted “nurse authorized pursuant to § 63-6-204, who is prescribing under the supervision, control and responsibility of a licensed physician, and who meets the requirements pursuant to § 63-7-207(14),” following “certified physician assistant,” in present (A)(i), and added (A)(ii).

The 2018 amendment substituted “the distinct pharmacist-provided service” for “the distinct service” in the definition of “medication therapy management program”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 334, § 15. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 617, § 2. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-205. Consultation on drugs by board to department of health.

The board shall, at the request of the commissioner of health, provide consultation to the department of health regarding drugs to be issued by the department or by a local health clinic.

The department of health shall develop policies and protocols for inventory controls, accountability, repackaging, security, storage and issuance of drugs by state and local health departments. The commissioner shall appoint a state or regional pharmacist to oversee these activities.

The commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 5; T.C.A. § 63-10-405; Acts 2014, ch. 585, § 1.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-206. Sale of nonprescription drugs and devices.

Any nonprescription drug or device can be sold in its original single package by any retail business unless such nonprescription drug or device is required by federal or state law to be dispensed or sold only by or under the supervision of a pharmacist.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) to the contrary, any insulin preparation shall be dispensed only by or under the supervision of a pharmacist. All insulin preparations must be properly stored in an area not accessible to the general public.

In order to comply with federal and state law requiring pharmacies to maintain patient profiles with a comprehensive list of medications and devices, pharmacists are authorized to execute prescription orders for nonprescription drugs and devices.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting nonprescription drugs and devices dispensed on a prescription order executed by a pharmacist from application of the sales and use tax provisions of title 67, chapter 6.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 6; T.C.A. § 63-10-406.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-207. Dispensing of medication prior to authorization.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a pharmacist may, in good faith, dispense to a patient without proper authorization the number of dosages of a prescription drug necessary to allow such patient to secure such authorization from such patient's prescriber, not to exceed a seventy-two-hour supply, if:

The patient offers satisfactory evidence to the pharmacist that the prescriber has placed the patient on a maintenance medication and that such patient is without valid refills or for some valid reason cannot obtain proper authorization; and

In the judgment of the pharmacist, the health, safety and welfare of the patient would otherwise be endangered.

This section shall not be construed to authorize dispensing of controlled substance medication without proper authorization.

If proper authorization cannot be obtained during the seventy-two-hour period, then the pharmacist may dispense the number of dosages necessary for one (1) additional consecutive seventy-two-hour period in accordance with the requirements of this section.

For the purpose of this subsection (d) only, “patient” means a patient from this state, or another state or territory, who was displaced by a disaster, as defined in § 58-2-101, when the patient is present in this state.

A pharmacist in this state may, in good faith, dispense to a patient without proper authorization or a valid prescription the number of dosages of a prescription drug necessary to allow the patient to secure proper authorization or a valid prescription from the patient's prescriber.

The amount of a prescription drug dispensed under this subsection (d) shall not exceed a twenty-day supply.

Prescription information may be obtained from a prescription label, verbal medical order, verbal prescription order, or any other means determined to be legitimate in the professional judgment of the pharmacist.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 7; T.C.A. § 63-10-407; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 4; 2018, ch. 615, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 615, § 2. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-208. Penalty for violation.

Any violation of parts 2-5 of this chapter, unless otherwise specified by law, shall be classified as a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 12; T.C.A. § 63-10-408; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-209. Distribution of drugs or drug samples by manufacturer's representative — Distribution of free samples.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the distribution of drugs or sample drugs by a manufacturer's representatives acting in the normal and customary performance of their duties.

Manufacturers or their agents may distribute free samples of prescription drugs or controlled substances to practitioners authorized by law to prescribe or dispense such drugs or to pharmacies of health care entities at the written request of a practitioner in accordance with federal law.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 21; T.C.A. § 63-10-409; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 5.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-210. Registration fees for out-of-state pharmacies mailing into Tennessee.

A pharmacy that dispenses and mails a prescription into Tennessee from another state shall first pay the licensure fee required of a Tennessee pharmacy in accordance with the fees established by the board under the authority of § 63-10-308. The license fees for out-of-state pharmacies and pharmacists shall not exceed those charged to Tennessee pharmacies and pharmacists.

Acts 1996, ch. 970, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-10-410; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Seeing Through the Murky Vial: Does the FDA Have the Authority to Stop Compounding Pharmacies from Pirate Manufacturing?, 66 Vand. L. Rev. 1609 (2013).

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

Attorney General Opinions. Inspection fees for out-of-state pharmacies licensed in Tennessee. OAG 14-05, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/9/14).

63-10-211. Consortia for bulk purchases authorized.

It is not a violation of any state law relative to restraint of trade, antitrust or any provision of the licensing laws for pharmacists, pharmacies, wholesalers, distributors or manufacturers under § 63-10-306 for pharmacists, independently or through any pharmacist or pharmacy, to form a consortium for the purpose of making bulk purchases of drugs or other medical equipment and supplies for the purpose of resale in their pharmacies.

Acts 1997, ch. 278, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-10-411.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-212. Confidentiality of information entrusted to pharmacist.

Notwithstanding any requirement of state law to the contrary, a pharmacist is immune from liability to any person for disclosing patient information to a person authorized by this title to prescribe drugs or devices or to communicate a prescription order where necessary to:

Fulfill the pharmacist's responsibility to carry out prospective drug use review under state law and 42 CFR Part 456 for the purpose of identifying and resolving actual or potential drug-related problems, including, for example, therapeutic duplication, drug-drug interactions, incorrect drug dosage, drug-disease contraindication, duration of drug treatment, or over-utilization or under-utilization and any other drug therapy problems outlined in 42 CFR § 456.705;

Assist prescribers in obtaining a comprehensive drug history on a patient;

Prevent abuse or misuse of any drug or device and the diversion of controlled substances; or

Provide a medication therapy management program or a quality assurance program.

Disclosure of information pursuant to this section shall not constitute a waiver of any confidentiality or privilege that may be provided by law.

This section shall apply only to confidentiality or privilege and shall not apply to actions arising in negligence.

Acts 1999, ch. 371, § 1; T.C.A. § 63-10-412; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 7.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-213. Legibility of prescriptions.

No pharmacist may dispense medication pursuant to a handwritten, typed or computer-generated prescription order for a drug issued by a prescriber in this state, unless the prescription order is comprehensible to the pharmacist. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a pharmacist from dispensing medication pursuant to a verbal prescription order.

If a prescriber issues a prescription order, then it is the duty of the prescriber to issue a legible order. A pharmacist shall make a reasonable attempt to contact the prescriber to seek clarification of a prescription order that is not comprehensible to the pharmacist, in which case the pharmacist must not dispense medication until the pharmacist obtains clarification. A pharmacist shall not be liable to any person for any reasonable delay caused when a pharmacist has reasonably sought clarification of a prescription order.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a pharmacist from dispensing medication prior to authorization in accordance with § 63-10-207.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 8; 2005, ch. 12, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 1 provided that the title of the act is and may be cited as the “Medication Error Reduction Act of 2004”.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 2 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly to create a uniform standard that health care providers must follow in issuing written or electronic prescription orders. This standard is intended to reduce medication related errors, which represent a major source of medical errors in the health care system. The general assembly finds that reducing medical errors will result in greater safety for patients as well as cost savings for the health care system in this state. By adopting these standards, the general assembly intends to promote medical safety for all patients who are issued drug prescriptions in this state.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 11 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any practitioner’s or pharmacist’s ability to order the use of or distribute non-prescription drugs or devices otherwise in accordance with applicable law.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 12 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as limiting any professional nurse's ability to issue drugs in accordance with the provisions of § 63-7-124.

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 13 provided that the department of health, division of health related boards and the board of pharmacy, are authorized to promulgate uniform rules to effect the purposes of this act in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The power and duty to enforce those rules shall be vested in the various boards that regulate health care providers affected by the act, in accordance with § 63-1-122 [repealed].

Acts 2004, ch. 678, § 14 provided that the act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before July 1, 2004.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-214. Centralized prescription processing — Licensing — Rules.

Each pharmacy participating in centralized prescription processing shall be licensed by the board of pharmacy.

The board shall promulgate rules relative to centralized prescription processing, including, but not limited to, the usage of common electronic files or a common database.

Acts 2008, ch. 966, § 1.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

Attorney General Opinions. “High volume” or “central fill” pharmacies are allowed to do business in Tennessee, OAG 09-016 (2/25/09).

63-10-215. Transfer of prescriptions to another prescription form.

Pharmacists, pharmacy interns and pharmacy technicians are authorized to comply with federal and state prescription requirements, including the requirement of a separate prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance found in §§ 63-1-160, 63-7-123(b)(3)(B), and 63-19-107(2)(E)(ii), by transferring from a prescription containing a Schedule Il controlled substance any drug that is a nonscheduled prescription drug or any prescribed supply to another prescription form.

The transfer authorized in subsection (a) may be accomplished by scanning, photocopying or transcribing, by hand or other means, and shall include all information regarding each drug or supply being transferred.

The prescription generated in a pharmacy by the transfer process shall not be required to be on tamper-resistant prescription paper.

The prescription generated in a pharmacy utilizing the transfer process shall be recognized as a valid, legal prescription order and shall serve as the original prescription for recordkeeping and other purposes.

Acts 2011, ch. 201, § 1; 2018, ch. 883, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 10 provided that the commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, substituted “§§ 63-1-160, 63-7-123(b)(3)(B), and 63-19-107(2)(E)(ii),” for “§§ 63-3-128, 63-5-122(g), 63-6-239, 63-8-129, 63-9-118, 63-7-123(b)(3)(B) and (F), and 63-19-107(2)(E)(ii) and (2)(G),” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 883, § 12. January 1, 2019; provided that for rulemaking purposes the act took effect May 3, 2018.

63-10-216. Compounding pharmacies.

Prior to initial licensure in this state as a compounding pharmacy, a pharmacy located outside of this state must have an inspection by the regulatory or licensing agency of the state in which the pharmacy practice site is physically located. Out-of-state pharmacy practice sites must provide a copy of the most recent inspection by the regulatory or licensing agency of the state in which the pharmacy practice site is physically located, which must have been within the previous twelve (12) months. Prior to renewal of its license in this state, an out-of-state pharmacy practice site must provide the most recent inspection by the regulatory or licensing agency of the state in which the pharmacy practice site is physically located or equivalent regulatory entity, and which must have been within the previous twelve (12) months. The board of pharmacy shall have the right to require additional information before issuing or renewing a pharmacy license to insure compliance with applicable laws of this state and any rules and policies of the board.

Any compounding pharmacy having an active Tennessee license shall notify the board within fourteen (14) business days of receipt of any order or decision by a regulatory agency, other than the Tennessee board of pharmacy, imposing any disciplinary action, including any warning, on the pharmacy.

Any pharmacies engaged in sterile compounding must comply with relevant United States Pharmacopeia (USP) guidelines as adopted by the board by rule or policy.

Any pharmacies engaging in sterile compounding, except hospital pharmacies compounding for inpatients of a hospital, shall report on a quarterly basis to the board the quantity of sterile compounded products dispensed in a defined time period in accordance with policies adopted by the board; provided, however, that the executive director of the board may request this information from a hospital pharmacy for cause and the hospital pharmacy shall be required to respond in a timely manner as defined by the executive director of the board.

Acts 2013, ch. 266, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Seeing Through the Murky Vial: Does the FDA Have the Authority to Stop Compounding Pharmacies from Pirate Manufacturing?, 66 Vand. L. Rev. 1609 (2013).

Attorney General Opinions. Inspection fees for out-of-state pharmacies licensed in Tennessee. OAG 14-05, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/9/14).